Rhode Island statutes. Title 29 Libraries
Chapter 3 State Law Library

29-3-1.
Custody — Use of library materials.

The supreme court shall have the custody of the state law library, and shall be responsible for the care and keeping of it. The state law library shall be open to the public; provided, however, no library materials shall be taken from it, except for the use of the Rhode Island judiciary, the general assembly, officers and employees of the executive branch, and attorneys at law admitted to practice in the courts of this or any other state, but any person may use the books within the library rooms.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 28, § 6; C.P.A. 1905, § 1088; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

29-3-1

; P.L. 2002, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 377, § 1.

29-3-2.
Law librarian — Hours library open.

The supreme court shall appoint a librarian, who shall cause the library to be kept open daily, Sundays and holidays excepted, from nine o’clock in the morning (9:00 a.m.) until five o’clock in the afternoon (5:00 p.m.), except during summer hours of the courts, when it may be closed at four-thirty o’clock in the afternoon (4:30 p.m.), and on Saturdays, when it may be closed at three o’clock in the afternoon (3:00 p.m.). The state court administrator, in consultation with the chief justice, shall have the authority to change the state law library hours for operational purposes and in the interest of public safety.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 28, § 6; C.P.A. 1905, § 1088; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

29-3-2

; P.L. 2002, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 377, § 1.

29-3-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 28, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

29-3-3

; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 222, § 2, effective June 28, 2002; P.L. 2002, ch. 377, § 2, effective June 28, 2002.

29-3-4.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary, to be expended under the direction of the justices of the supreme court, for the purchase of legal information, both print and electronic, for the state law library, the law library in the J. Joseph Garrahy judicial complex in Providence, the law libraries in Kent, Newport, and Washington Counties, and the judges and staff of the judiciary.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 28, § 7; P.L. 1899, ch. 619, § 1; C. P. A. 1905, § 1089; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 13; P.L. 1909, ch. 408, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 16; P.L. 1929, ch. 1313, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

29-3-4

; P.L. 2002, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 377, § 3.